Tennessee, session 114, HB1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The state board of education may issue an alternative instructional leader
license to a candidate who meets the requirements of this section for the person to serve
as a principal, an assistant principal, or an instructional supervisor. An alternative
instructional leader license may be issued to a candidate who:
(1) Holds an advanced degree, as defined in § 49-4-902, from an
institution of higher education in an education-related or human development-
related field, including, but not limited to, higher education administration, school
administration, educational leadership, curriculum and instruction, and teaching;
(2) Has, and can provide, documentation evidencing, at least three (3)
years of experience in a leadership position at a Category I, II, or III private
school, an LEA, a public charter school, or a postsecondary institution;
(3) Earns a qualifying score on an assessment, as defined and
determined by the state board of education by rule;
(4) Submits documentation demonstrating the candidate's completion of
the requirements in § 49-5-5619(c); and
(5) Does not currently hold an educator licensure.
(b) An alternative instructional leader license issued pursuant to this section is
valid for four (4) years and is not renewable.
HB1117
002887
- 1 -

(c) A person who holds an alternative instructional leader license for four (4)
years is automatically eligible to be issued an instructional leader license regardless of
whether the person meets the requirements for an instructional leader license as
established by rules promulgated by the state board.
(d) This section does not prohibit the state board from creating other pathways
for a person to obtain an instructional leader license.
(e) The state board may promulgate rules to effectuate this section in
accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter
5.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-5619(c)(4), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(G) Effective on July 1, 2025, a candidate seeking an alternative instructional
leader license pursuant to SECTION 1.
SECTION 3. For purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the
public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002887